Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5858.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-13-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-13 entitled "Maternal and
Child Health Services for Children with Special Health Care Needs" is hereby amended to read as
follows:
23-13-9. Licensing and regulation of midwives — Penalty for violations.
(a) The state director of health is authorized and directed to make rules for the regulation
of the practice of midwifery and for the licensing of midwives, including regulations that require
the payment of an initial application fee equal to that fee that is imposed upon applicants for
licensure as nurse practitioners and a renewal fee also equivalent to that for nurse practitioners. The
rules regarding the regulation of the practice of midwifery shall authorize a licensed, certified
nurse-midwife (CNM) or a licensed, certified midwife (CM) to prescribe medications that might
be reasonably required by his or her patients; provided however, that a licensed, certified nurse-
midwife (CNM) or a licensed, certified midwife (CM) shall prescribe any of those medications as
authorized by the director of health. The provisions of this section relating to prescription authority
by certified nurse-midwives and certified midwives shall be overseen by the department of health
as defined in the department’s rules and regulations for licensing of midwives (R23-13MID). No
person not a licensed midwife or a physician, registered under the provisions of chapter 37 of title
5, shall practice midwifery, or shall make a practice of attending women in childbirth for hire, or
use the name or title of midwife. Any person who violates the provisions of this section, or who

violates any of the rules of the department of health made in pursuance of this section, shall be
fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or
both, and the director of health may revoke the license issued to any person when, in the opinion
of the director of health, that person is guilty of unprofessional conduct.
(b) Scope of prescriptive authority for a certified professional midwife with prescriptive
authority under this section shall have the ability to order, obtain, carry and administer the following
medications in accordance with their training and practice:
(1) Lactation pumps and equipment;
(2) Nipple shields;
(3) Compression stockings and belts;
(4) Maternity belts;
(5) Diaphragms and cervical caps;
(6) Glucometers and testing strips;
(7) Iron supplements;
(8) Prenatal vitamins;
(9) Recommended vaccines;
(10) Prophylactic ophthalmic medication;
(11) Postpartum oxytocic;
(12) Vitamin K;
(13) Rho (D) immune globulin;
(14) Local anesthetic;
(15) Intravenous fluids and equipment;
(16) Sterile water for intradermal injections for pain relief;
(17) Magnesium sulfate for prevention or treatment of maternal peripartum seizures
pending transport;
(18) Epinephrine for use in maternal peripartum anaphylaxis resuscitation and neonatal
resuscitation;
(19) Measles, Mumps, and Rubella (MMR) vaccine to nonimmune postpartum individuals;
(20) Tetanus, diphtheria, acellular pertussis (Tdap) vaccine for use in pregnancy;
(21) Hepatitis B (HBV) birth dose for any newborn administration;
(22) HBIG and HBV for any neonates born to a hepatitis B positive gestational parent;
(23) Influenza vaccine;
(24) Any vaccines recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC)
advisory committee on immunization practices for pregnant or postpartum individuals or infants in
LC001903 - Page 2 of 4

the first two (2) weeks after birth or pregnant or postpartum individuals;
(25) Terbutaline to temporarily decrease contractions pending emergent intrapartum
transport;
(26) Antibiotics for intrapartum prophylaxis of Group B (beta hemolytic) Streptococcus
(GBS);
(27) Antihemorrhagic drugs to treat postpartum hemorrhage including, but not limited to,
intravenous tranexamic acid, oxytocin, misoprostol, methergine, and prostaglandin F2 alpha;
(28) Nifedipine for indication of preterm labor pending transport;
(29) Antibiotics;
(30) Antiemetics;
(31) Antivirals;
(32) Antifungals;
(33) Low-potency topical steroids;
(34) Antipruritic medications and therapies;
(35) Galactagogues;
(36) Topical analgesia for anal, vulvar, and perineal pain;
(37) Preterm labor preventatives;
(38) Stool softeners;
(39) Vitamins and minerals for preventing and treating deficiencies;
(40) Over-the-counter medications as needed;
(41) Nonopioid medication for therapeutic rest;
(42) Medications for miscarriage prevention and completion;
(43) Smoking cessation;
(44) Prescription referrals for IV iron infusions;
(45) Intraosseous;
(46) Umbilical venous catheters for neonatal resuscitation;
(47) Intramuscular tranexamic;
(48) Oxygen and equipment;
(49) Rhogam;
(50) All-purpose nipple ointment; and
(51) Injectable Lidocaine.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001903
========
LC001903 - Page 3 of 4